Utah statutes.
31A-22-1201.   Assumption agreement.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), a credit for reinsurance ceded under Section 31A-17-404, 31A-17-404.1, or 31A-17-404.2, is not allowed unless, in addition to meeting the requirements of Section 31A-17-404, 31A-17-404.1, or 31A-17-404.2, the reinsurance agreement provides in substance that if the ceding insurer is insolvent, the reinsurance is payable by the assuming insurer:

(a)  on the basis of the liability of the ceding insurer under the contract or contracts reinsured;

(b)  without diminution because of the insolvency of the ceding insurer; and

(c)  directly to the ceding insurer or to its domiciliary liquidator or receiver.

(2)  Subsection (1) applies except if:

(a)  a contract specifically provides another payee of the insurance in the event of the insolvency of the ceding insurer; or

(b)  the assuming insurer, with the consent of the one or more direct insureds, assumes the policy obligations of the ceding insurer:

(i)  as direct obligations of the assuming insurer to the payees under the policies; and

(ii)  in substitution for the obligations of the ceding insurer to the payees.



Amended by Chapter 257, 2008 General Session

